Utah statutes.
63B-1-318.   Division duties -- Reimbursement.

(1)  The division shall:

(a)  construct, maintain, allocate the space in, and dispose of all facilities acquired or constructed for the authority with the proceeds of obligations of the authority; and

(b)  do all things necessary to keep those facilities in good order and repair.

(2)  The division may perform all of the duties established in Subsection (1) pursuant to contracts with the authority.

(3)  The division shall be reimbursed for all direct costs of maintenance by the authority from funds derived from rental or lease payments.

(4)  Nothing contained in this part may be construed to limit, supersede, or otherwise change in any way the authority of the division provided in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 86, 2003 General Session

